dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="efor/us__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="modus__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skit__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="säg/en__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>nerna</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>enn</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ner</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paraply__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="farao__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nerna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ner</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ot__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>oten</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ot</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ötterna</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ötter</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="br/or__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>odern</l><r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orn</l><r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oder</l><r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öder</l><r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öderna</l><r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ankar/e__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sotbr/and__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ann</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>anden</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>and</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änder</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änderna</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alluvi/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umet</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e-b/ok__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ok</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oken</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öckerna</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öcker</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="libido__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="drivankare"><i>drivankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="styltrot"><i>styltr</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrabok"><i>kontrab</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kvadratrot"><i>kvadratr</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lagerbok"><i>lagerb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bladfot"><i>bladf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="murankare"><i>murankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sopprot"><i>soppr</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="moringsankare"><i>moringsankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="alluvium"><i>alluvi</i><par n="alluvi/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="birot"><i>bir</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sotbrand"><i>sotbr</i><par n="sotbr/and__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="resandebok"><i>resandeb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="simfot"><i>simf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="läsebok"><i>läseb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sägen"><i>säg</i><par n="säg/en__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gräsrot"><i>gräsr</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="halvbror"><i>halvbr</i><par n="br/or__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="hålfot"><i>hålf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="evangeliebok"><i>evangelieb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bogankare"><i>bogankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skit"><i>skit</i><par n="skit__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="farao"><i>farao</i><par n="farao__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lärobok"><i>lärob</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tandrot"><i>tandr</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="stockankare"><i>stockankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="eforus"><i>efor</i><par n="efor/us__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tidebok"><i>tideb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ankare"><i>ankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="signalbok"><i>signalb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tassfot"><i>tassf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="plånbok"><i>plånb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="drickankare"><i>drickankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="modus"><i>modus</i><par n="modus__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="bockfot"><i>bockf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="luftrot"><i>luftr</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gaffelankare"><i>gaffelankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hörsägen"><i>hörsäg</i><par n="säg/en__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="seminarium"><i>seminari</i><par n="alluvi/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="krigsdagbok"><i>krigsdagb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="folksägen"><i>folksäg</i><par n="säg/en__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="strumpfot"><i>strumpf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sängfot"><i>sängf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="vapenbok"><i>vapenb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lakritsrot"><i>lakritsr</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="julgransfot"><i>julgransf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="arbetsbok"><i>arbetsb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="småbarnsbok"><i>småbarnsb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="libido"><i>libido</i><par n="libido__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="besöksbok"><i>besöksb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="examinatorium"><i>examinatori</i><par n="alluvi/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dubror"><i>dubr</i><par n="br/or__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tänkebok"><i>tänkeb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ordfot"><i>ordf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="farbror"><i>farbr</i><par n="br/or__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bakfot"><i>bakf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="morbror"><i>morbr</i><par n="br/or__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="nyhetsankare"><i>nyhetsankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gripfot"><i>gripf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="paraply"><i>paraply</i><par n="paraply__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="baklängesordbok"><i>baklängesordb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gåsfot"><i>gåsf</i><par n="r/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="skrivbok"><i>skrivb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bror"><i>br</i><par n="br/or__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="nybörjarbok"><i>nybörjarb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kärnvapenparaply"><i>kärnvapenparaply</i><par n="paraply__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="koralbok"><i>koralb</i><par n="e-b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
